Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5411
Application; time of filing.

Any complete application filed on or after July 13, 2000, shall be considered a valid application on the date submitted for the purposes of the Rural Economic Opportunities Act.

Laws 2000, LB 936, § 11.